Utah statutes.
20A-7-704.   Initiative measures -- Arguments for and against -- Voters'
requests for argument -- Ballot arguments.
(1) (a) (i) (A)  By August 10 of the regular general election year, the
sponsors of any initiative petition that has been declared sufficient by the
lieutenant governor may deliver to the lieutenant governor an  argument for
the adoption of the measure.
(B)  If two or more sponsors wish to submit arguments for the measure, the
lieutenant governor shall designate one of them to submit the argument for his
side of the measure.
(ii) (A)  Any member of the Legislature may request permission to submit an
argument against the adoption of the measure.
(B)  If two or more legislators wish to submit an argument against the
measure, the presiding officers of the Senate and House of Representatives
shall jointly designate one of them to submit the argument to the lieutenant
governor.
(b)  The sponsors and the legislators submitting arguments shall ensure that
each argument:
(i)  does not exceed 500 words in length; and
(ii)  is delivered by August 10.
(2) (a) (i)  If an argument for or against a measure to be submitted to the
voters by initiative petition has not been filed within the time required by
Subsection (1), any voter may request the lieutenant governor for permission
to prepare an argument for the side on which no argument has been prepared.
(ii)  If two or more voters request permission to submit arguments on the same
side of a measure, the lieutenant governor shall designate one of the voters
to write the argument.
(b)  Any argument prepared under this subsection shall be submitted to the
lieutenant governor by August 20.
(3)  The lieutenant governor may not accept a ballot argument submitted under
this section unless it is accompanied by:
(a)  the name and address of the person submitting it, if it is submitted by
an individual voter; or
(b)  the name and address of the organization and the names and addresses of
at least two of its principal officers, if it is submitted on behalf of an
organization.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), the authors may not amend or
change the arguments after they are submitted to the lieutenant governor.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), the lieutenant governor may not
alter the arguments in any way.
(c)  The lieutenant governor and the authors of an argument may jointly modify
an argument after it is submitted if:
(i)  they jointly agree that changes to the argument must be made to correct
spelling or grammatical errors; and
(ii)  the argument has not yet been submitted for typesetting.
